Wisconsin, session 2025, AB844.
do enact as follows:AB844,11Section 1. 101.02 (7r) (h) of the statutes is created to read:AB844,2,62101.02 (7r) (h) Notwithstanding par. (a), a county, city, village, or town may 3enact and enforce an ordinance establishing an energy code that is stricter than 4rules promulgated by the department under s. 101.027 (2) if the ordinance is in 5strict conformity with the stretch energy code established by the stretch energy 6code working group under s. 101.028 (2).AB844,27Section 2. 101.028 of the statutes is created to read:AB844,2,118101.028 Stretch energy code. (1) The department shall create a stretch 9energy code working group consisting of the secretary, or his or her designee, and 10other members appointed by the secretary, or his or her designee, who are any of 11the following:AB844,2,1212(a) An employee of the department.AB844,2,1313(b) An industry leader in deep clean energy.AB844,2,1414(c) A nonprofit leader focused on scaling climate solutions.AB844,2,1515(d) A representative from a municipality that has a climate action plan.AB844,2,2016(2) No later than December 31, 2026, the stretch energy code working group 17shall establish the stretch energy code, which shall have separate components for 18commercial and residential buildings and shall establish minimum energy 19efficiency requirements that may exceed the minimum energy efficiency 20requirements established in the energy conservation code under s. 101.027.AB844,3,41(3) A county, city, village, or town may by ordinance adopt the residential or 2commercial components of the stretch energy code, or both, and make the adopted 3requirements of the stretch energy code applicable within the county, city, village, 4or town.AB844,35Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.AB844,3,96(1) The authorized FTE positions for the department of safety and 7professional services are increased by 1.0 GPR project position, to be funded from 8the appropriation under s. 20.165 (1) (a), for the purpose of administering the 9creation of the stretch energy code under s. 101.028.AB844,3,1010